en: Masonry & Tile Saws
xx: Masonry & Tile Saws
cs: Pily na dlažbu a obklady
da: Mur- og flisesave
de: Fliesensägen
es: Sierras para baldosas y albañilería
fr: Scies de maçon et scies à carrelage
it: Taglia mattoni e piastrelle
ja: タイルソー
nl: Steen- en tegelzagen
no: Flis- og mursager
pl: Przecinarki do cegieł i glazury
pt: Serras de azulejo e alvenaria
ru: Пилы для резки кирпичей и плиток
sv: Sågar för murverk och kakel
tr: Taş ve Karo Testereleri

en: Miter Saws
xx: Miter Saws
cs: Pokosové pily
da: Geringsave
de: Gehrungssägen
es: Sierras ingletadoras
fr: Scies à onglet
it: Troncatrici
ja: マイターソー
nl: Verstekzagen
no: Gjæresager
pl: Ukośnice
pt: Serras de esquadria
ru: Зуборезные пилы
sv: Geringssågar
tr: Gönye Burun Testereler

en: Panel Saws
xx: Panel Saws
cs: Panelové pily
da: Panelsave
de: Plattensägen
es: Mesas de corte
fr: Scies à panneaux
it: Seghe a pannello
ja: パネルソー
nl: Formaatzagen
no: Panelsager
pl: Piły panelowe
pt: Serras de painel
ru: Форматно-обрезные станки
sv: Panelsågar
tr: Levha Testereleri

en: Reciprocating Saws
xx: Reciprocating Saws
cs: Elektrické pily ocasky
da: Dobbeltrettede save
de: Säbelsägen
es: Sierras de sable
fr: Scies alternatives
it: Seghetti alternativi
ja: 往復式のこぎり
nl: Elektrische zaag
no: Stikksager
pl: Pilarki szablowe
pt: Serras sabre
ru: Сабельные пилы
sv: Ramsåg
tr: İleri Geri Hareketli Testereler

en: Scroll Saws
xx: Scroll Saws
cs: Lupínkové pily
da: Løvsave
de: Dekupiersägen
es: Sierras de calar
fr: Scies à chantourner
it: Seghetti da traforo
ja: 糸のこ盤
nl: Figuurzaagmachines
no: Kontursager
pl: Pilarki taśmowe
pt: Serras de recortes de bancada
ru: Ажурные пилы
sv: Kontursågar
tr: Oyma Testereleri

en: Table Saws
xx: Table Saws
cs: Stolní pily
da: Bordsave
de: Tischkreissägen
es: Sierras de mesa
fr: Scies à table
it: Seghe da piano, banchi sega
ja: テーブルソー
nl: Tafelzagen
no: Sirkelsager
pl: Piły stołowe
pt: Serras de mesa
ru: Отрезные станки со столом
sv: Bordscirkelsåg
tr: Masa Testereleri

en: Screwdrivers
xx: Screwdrivers
cs: Šroubováky
da: Skruetrækkere
de: Schraubendreher
es: Destornilladores
fr: Tournevis et visseuses, Visseuse électrique, Tournevis
it: Cacciaviti
ja: ドライバー
nl: Schroevendraaiers
no: Skrutrekkere
pl: Śrubokręty
pt: Chaves de fenda
ru: Отвертки
sv: Skruvmejslar
tr: Tornavidalar

en: Shapers
xx: Shapers
cs: Obrážečky
da: Shapere
de: Stoßmaschinen
es: Limadoras
fr: Burins de tournage
it: Limatrici
ja: シェーパー
nl: Freesbanken
no: Shapere
pl: Strugarki poprzeczne
pt: Moldadores
ru: Инструменты для формообработки
sv: Kipphyvlar
tr: Vargeller

en: Sharpeners
xx: Sharpeners
cs: Ostření
da: Slibeværktøjer
de: Schärfgeräte
es: Sacapuntas o afiladores
fr: Aiguiseurs
it: Affilatrici\, temperamatite
ja: シャープナー
nl: Slijpmachines
no: Slipeverktøy
pl: Ostrzałki
pt: Afiadores
ru: Точила
sv: Slipverktyg
tr: Bileyiciler

en: Socket Drivers
xx: Socket Drivers
cs: Nástrčné šroubováky
da: Topnøgler
de: Steckschlüssel
es: Llaves para tuercas
fr: Tournevis à douilles
it: Cacciaviti testa esagonale
ja: ナットドライバー
nl: Moerdraaiers
no: Bitstrekkere
pl: Śrubokręty nasadkowe
pt: Chaves de porca
ru: Гайковерты
sv: Muttermejslar
tr: Lokma Uçlu Tornavidalar

en: Soldering Irons
xx: Soldering Irons
cs: Pájky
da: Loddekolber
de: Lötkolben
es: Cautines
fr: Fers à souder
it: Saldatori
ja: ハンダゴテ
nl: Soldeerbouten
no: Loddebolter
pl: Lutownice
pt: Ferros de solda
ru: Паяльники
sv: Lödkolvar
tr: Lehim Aletleri

en: Tap Reseaters
xx: Tap Reseaters
cs: Zabrušovače ventilů
da: Fræsebits
de: Wasseranschluss-Nachschleifwerkzeuge
es: Giramachos
fr: Rectifieuses de robinet
it: Frese per rubinetti
ja: 蛇口修復ツール
nl: Draadtap voor kranen
no: Kranverktøy
pl: Urządzenia do naprawy kranów
pt: Ferramentas para refazer roscas
ru: Инструменты для притирки кранов
sv: Verktyg för byte av ventilsäte
tr: Musluk Göbeği Yenileme Aletleri

en: Taps & Dies
xx: Taps & Dies
cs: Závitníky a závitnice
da: Gevindskæresæt
de: Gewindebohrer
es: Roscas
fr: Tarauds
it: Maschi filettatori e filiere
ja: タップ・ダイス
nl: Draadtappen en -snijplaten
no: Gjengesett
pl: Gwintowniki i narzynki
pt: Machos e cossinetes
ru: Метчики
sv: Stansset
tr: Kılavuz Pafta Setleri

en: Threading Machines
xx: Threading Machines
cs: Závitovací stroje
da: Trådningsmaskiner
de: Gewindeschneidmaschinen
es: Máquinas de roscar
fr: Machines à fileter
it: Filettatrici
ja: ネジ切り盤
nl: Draadsnijmachines
no: Gjengemaskiner
pl: Maszyny do nacinania gwintu
pt: Máquinas de rosquear
ru: Резьбонарезные станки
sv: Trådningsmaskiner
tr: Yiv Açma Makineleri

en: Tool Clamps & Vises
xx: Tool Clamps & Vises
cs: Svorky a svěráky
da: Skruetvinger
de: Schraubzwingen & -stöcke
es: Abrazaderas y tornillos
fr: Serre-joints et étaux
it: Morse e morsetti
ja: クランプ
nl: Werkstukklemmen
no: Skrutvinger og skrustikker
pl: Zaciski i imadła narzędziowe
pt: Braçadeiras de ferramentas
ru: Тиски и струбцины
sv: Skruvtvingar
tr: Alet Mengeneleri

en: Tool Files
xx: Tool Files
cs: Pořadače na nářadí
da: Værktøjsfiler
de: Werkzeugfeilen
es: Limas para herramientas
fr: Lime à outils
it: Utensile lime
ja: 工業用ヤスリ
nl: Vijlen
no: Verktøyfiler
pl: Pilniki narzędziowe
pt: Limas para ferramentas
ru: Напильники
sv: Verktygsfilar
tr: Alet Eğeleri

en: Tool Keys
xx: Tool Keys
cs: Nástrojové klíče
da: Værktøjsnøgler
de: Werkzeugschlüssel
es: Llaves
fr: Clés de serrage
it: Utensile Chiavi
ja: 開閉キー
nl: Sleutels voor gereedschap
no: Verktøynøkler
pl: Klucze narzędziowe
pt: Chaves para ferramentas
ru: Прямые Т-образные ключи
sv: Verktygsnycklar
tr: Alet Anahtarları

en: Tool Knives
xx: Tool Knives
cs: Pracovní nože
da: Værktøjsknive
de: Werkzeugmesser
es: Espátulas
fr: Couteaux-outils
it: Utensile Spatole
ja: 工業用ナイフ・カッター
nl: Snijgereedschap
no: Verktøykniver
pl: Noże narzędziowe
pt: Estiletes
ru: Технические ножи
sv: Verktygsknivar
tr: Alet Bıçakları

en: Tool Sets
xx: Tool Sets
cs: Sady nářadí
da: Værktøjssæt
de: Werkzeugsets
es: Juegos de herramientas
fr: Jeux d'outils
it: Set di attrezzi
ja: 工具セット
nl: Gereedschapsets
no: Verktøysett
pl: Zestawy narzędzi
pt: Conjuntos de ferramentas
ru: Наборы инструментов
sv: Verktygsset
tr: Alet Takımları

en: Hand Tool Sets
xx: Hand Tool Sets
cs: Sady ručních nástrojů
da: Håndværktøjssæt
de: Handwerkzeugsets
es: Juegos de herramientas manuales
fr: Jeux d'outils à main
it: Set di utensili
ja: 手工具セット
nl: Handgereedschapsets
no: Sett med håndverktøy
pl: Zestawy narzędzi ręcznych
pt: Conjuntos de ferramentas manuais
ru: Наборы ручных инструментов
sv: Set med handverktyg
tr: El Aleti Takımları